Hawaii statutes.
[§398-24] Appeal and hearing. (a)
Upon appeal by the employer, the order issued by the department shall be
subject to a de novo review by a hearings officer appointed by the director.

(b) The hearings officer shall schedule a
contested case hearing that shall be heard in accordance with chapter 91.

(c) At any time after the filing of an appeal
under subsection (a), but prior to the hearing, the hearings officer may hold a
prehearing conference with the parties or their representatives.

(d) If a hearing is held as provided under
subsection (b), the hearings officer shall issue a decision and grant relief as
provided under this chapter.

(e) Any person aggrieved by the decision of
the hearings officer shall be entitled to judicial review as provided by
section 91-14.

(f) The hearings officer may administer oaths,
take or cause to be taken depositions of witnesses, and may issue subpoenas to
compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of records,
payrolls, correspondence, documents, or other material relating to any matter
to be heard. [L 1995, c 154, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next